da: Kompatibel basskalalængde: Ekstra lang skala; Lang skala; Medium skala; Multi-skala/fanned fret; Kort skala; Andet
sv: Kompatibel basskalelängd: Extra lång skala; Lång skala; Mediumskala; Multiskala/solfjädersband (fanned fret); Kort skala; Övrigt
de: Kompatible Mensur für Bassgitarren: Extra Long Scale; Long Scale; Medium Scale; Multi-Scale/Fanned Fret; Short Scale; Sonstige
fi: Yhteensopiva basson mensuuripituus: Erittäin pitkä skaala; Pitkä skaala; Keskipitkä skaala; Moniskaalainen / fanned fret; Lyhyt skaala; Muu
ru: Совместимая мензура бас-гитары: Очень длинная мензура (Extra-long); Длинная мензура (Long scale); Средняя мензура (Medium scale); Мультимензура / Веерные лады; Короткая мензура (Short scale); Другое
hu: Kompatibilis basszusgitár menzúra hossza: Extra hosszú menzúra; Hosszú menzúra; Közepes menzúra; Többmenzúrás / legyező alakú bundozás; Rövid menzúra; Egyéb
th: ความยาวสเกลของเบสที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: สเกลยาวพิเศษ; สเกลยาว; สเกลกลาง; มัลติสเกล/เฟร็ตเอียง; สเกลสั้น; อื่นๆ
tr: Uyumlu bas skala uzunluğu: Ekstra uzun ölçek; Uzun ölçek; Orta ölçek; Çoklu ölçek/Yelpaze perde; Kısa ölçek; Diğer
it: lunghezza della scala del basso compatibile: Scala extra lunga; Scala lunga; Scala media; Scala multipla/Fanned fret; Scala corta; Altro
pt-PT: Comprimento de expansão de graves compatível: Escala extralonga; Escala longa; Escala média; Multiescala/trastes em leque; Escala curta; Outro
sl-SI: Združljiva dolžina lestvice bas kitare: Zelo dolga menzura; Dolga menzura; Srednja menzura; Večkratna menzura/pahljačaste prečke; Kratka menzura; Drugo
zh-CN: 适配贝斯有效弦长: 特长有效弦长; 长有效弦长; 中有效弦长; 多有效弦长/扇形品; 短有效弦长; 其他
nb: Kompatibel bassskalalengde: Ekstra lang skala; Lang skala; Medium skala; Multiskala/viftede bånd; Kort skala; Annet
lt-LT: Suderinamas bosinės gitaros menzūros ilgis: Ypač ilgos skalės; Ilgos skalės; Vidutinės skalės; Kelių skalių / vėduokliniai skirsniai; Trumpos skalės; Kita
es: Longitud de escala de bajo compatible: Escala extralarga; Escala larga; Escala media; Multiescala/trastes en abanico; Escala corta; Otro
nl: Compatibele bas mensuurlengte: Extra lange mensuur; Lange mensuur; Gemiddelde mensuur; Multi-mensuur/fanned fret; Korte mensuur; Overige
cs: Kompatibilní mensura baskytary: Extra dlouhá menzura; Dlouhá menzura; Střední menzura; Multiscale / zkosené pražce; Krátká menzura; Ostatní
pt-BR: Comprimento de escala de baixo compatível: Escala extralonga; Escala longa; Escala média; Multiescala/trastes em leque; Escala curta; Outro
ro-RO: Lungimea scalei de bas compatibile: Scală extra-lungă; Scală lungă; Scală medie; Multiscală/taste în evantai; Scală scurtă; Altele
zh-TW: 相容貝斯弦長: 特長有效弦長; 長有效弦長; 中有效弦長; 多重有效弦長/扇形琴格; 短有效弦長; 其他
bg-BG: Съвместима дължина на мензурата на баса: Много дълга скала; Дълга скала; Средна скала; Многомащабна (multi-scale)/Ветрилообразни прагчета; Къса скала; Друго
el: Συμβατό μήκος κλίμακας μπάσων: Πολύ μεγάλη κλίμακα; Μεγάλη κλίμακα; Μεσαία κλίμακα; Πολλαπλή κλίμακα/fanned fret; Μικρή κλίμακα; Άλλο
pl: Kompatybilna długość skali basu: Bardzo długa menzura; Długa menzura; Średnia menzura; Wieloskalowa / fanned fret; Krótka menzura; Inna
vi: Chiều dài dây câu cá vược tương thích: Cần cực dài; Cần dài; Cần trung bình; Đa chiều dài/phím quạt; Cần ngắn; Khác
hr-HR: Kompatibilna duljina bas skale: Vrlo duga skala; Duga skala; Srednja skala; Višestruka skala / kosi pragovi; Kratka skala; Ostalo
sk-SK: Kompatibilná dĺžka basovej menzúry: Extra dlhá menzúra; Dlhá menzúra; Stredná menzúra; Viacmenzúrové/vejárovité pražce; Krátka menzúra; Iné
ko: 호환 가능한 베이스 확장 길이: 엑스트라 롱 스케일; 롱 스케일; 미디엄 스케일; 멀티 스케일/팬드 프렛; 숏 스케일; 기타
fr: Longueur de diapason de basse compatible: Diapason extra long; Diapason long; Diapason moyen; Multi-diapason/frettes en éventail; Diapason court; Autre
ja: 互換性のある低音拡大長さ: エクストラロングスケール; ロングスケール; ミディアムスケール; マルチスケール/ファンドフレット; ショートスケール; その他
en: Compatible bass scale length: Extra-long scale; Long scale; Medium scale; Multi-scale/fanned fret; Short scale; Other